North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 9. Child Support.
§ 110-136.7.
Multiple withholding.

When an obligor is subject to more than one withholding for child support, withholding for current child support shall have priority over past-due support. Where two or more orders for current support exist, each family shall receive a pro rata share of the total amount withheld based on the respective child support orders being enforced.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2.

§ 110-136.8.
Notice to payor; payor’s responsibilities.

Contents of notice.— Notice to a payor of his obligation to withhold shall include information regarding the payor’s rights and responsibilities, the amount of disposable income attributable to that payor on which that withholding is based, the penalties under this section, and the maximum percentages of disposable income that may be withheld as provided in

G.S. 110-136.6

.

Payor’s responsibilities.— A payor who has been properly served with a notice to withhold is required to:

Withhold from the obligor’s disposable income and, within 7 business days of the date the obligor is paid, send to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit the amount specified in the notice and the date the amount was withheld, but in no event more than the amount allowed by

G.S. 110-136.6

; however, if a lesser amount of disposable income is available for any pay period, the payor shall either:

Compute, and send the appropriate amount to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit, using the percentages as provided in

G.S. 110-136.6

; or

Request the initiating party to inform the payor of the proper amount to be withheld for that period;

Continue withholding until further notice from the IV-D agency, the clerk of superior court, or the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit;

Withhold for child support before withholding pursuant to any other legal process under State law against the same disposable income;

Begin withholding from the first payment due the obligor in the first pay period that occurs 14 days following the date the notice of the obligation to withhold was served on the payor;

Promptly notify the obligee in a IV-D case, or the clerk of superior court or the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit in a non-IV-D case, in writing:

If there are one or more orders of child support withholding for the obligor;

a1.

If there are one or more orders of alimony or postseparation support withholding for the obligor;

When the obligor terminates employment or otherwise ceases to be entitled to disposable income from the payor, and provide the obligor’s last known address, and the name and address of his new employer, if known;

Of the payor’s inability to comply with the withholding for any reason; and

Cooperate fully with the initiating party in the verification of the amount of the obligor’s disposable income.

Change in obligor’s employment.— If the obligor changes employment within the State when withholding is in effect, the requirement for withholding shall continue, and

In a IV-D case, the IV-D obligee shall make any necessary adjustments to the withholding, notify the obligor and his new employer in accordance with this section, and file a copy of the adjusted withholding with the clerk of superior court;

In a non-IV-D case, the clerk shall serve a notice of obligation to withhold according to the terms of the withholding order on the new employer and on the obligor; if the obligor or payor gives notice that an adjustment to the withholding order, other than the change in payor, is needed, the matter shall be scheduled for hearing before a child support hearing officer or district court judge who shall make any necessary adjustments to the withholding.

The payor may combine amounts withheld from obligors’ disposable incomes in a single payment to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit if the payor separately identifies by name and case number the portion of the single payment attributable to each individual obligor and the date that each payment was withheld from the obligor’s disposable income.

Prohibited conduct by payor; civil penalty.— Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a court finds, pursuant to a motion in the cause filed by the initiating party joining the payor as a third party defendant, with 30 days notice to answer the motion, that a payor has willfully refused to comply with the provisions of this section, such payor shall be ordered to commence withholding and shall be held liable to the initiating party for any amount which such payor should have withheld, except that such payor shall not be required to vary the normal pay or disbursement cycles in order to comply with these provisions.A payor shall not discharge from employment, refuse to employ, or otherwise take disciplinary action against any obligor solely because of the withholding. When a court finds that a payor has taken any of these actions, the payor shall be liable for a civil penalty. For a first offense, the civil penalty shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00). For second and third offenses, the civil penalty shall be five hundred dollars ($500.00) and one thousand dollars ($1,000), respectively. Any payor who violates any provision of this paragraph shall be liable in a civil action for reasonable damages suffered by an obligor as a result of the violation, and an obligor discharged or demoted in violation of this paragraph shall be entitled to be reinstated to his former position. The statute of limitations for actions under this subsection shall be one year pursuant to

G.S. 1-54

.The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Any payor who withholds the sum provided in any notice or order to the payor shall not be liable for any penalties under this section.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1987, c. 589, s. 2; 1991, c. 541, ss. 1, 2; 1997-433, s. 6; 1997-465, s. 27; 1998-17, s. 1; 1998-176, s. 7; 1998-215, s. 76; 1999-293, ss. 19, 20.

§ 110-136.9.
Payment of withheld funds.

In all cases, the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit shall distribute payments received from payors to the appropriate recipient.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-293, s. 21.

§ 110-136.10.
Termination of withholding.

A requirement that income be withheld for child support shall promptly terminate as to prospective payments when the payor receives notice from the court or IV-D agency that:

The child support order has expired or become invalid; or

The initiating party, the obligor, and the district court judge agree to termination because there is another adequate means to collect child support or arrearages; or

The whereabouts of the child and obligee are unknown, except that withholding shall not be terminated until all valid arrearages to the State are paid in full.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, s. 2.

§ 110-136.11.
National Medical Support Notice required.

Notice Required. — The National Medical Support Notice shall be used to notify employers and health insurers or health care plan administrators of an order entered pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.11

for dependent health benefit plan coverage in a IV-D case. For purposes of this section and

G.S. 110-136.12

through

G.S. 110-136.14

, the terms “health benefit plan” and “health insurer” are as defined in G.S. 108A-69(a).

Exception. — The National Medical Support Notice shall not be used in cases where the court has ordered nonemployment-based health benefit plan coverage or where the parties have stipulated to nonemployment-based health benefit plan coverage.

History.

2001-237, s. 8.

§ 110-136.12.
IV-D agency responsibilities.

Within five business days after the order for dependent health benefit plan coverage has been filed in a IV-D case, the IV-D agency shall serve, pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure, the National Medical Support Notice on the employer, if known to the agency, of the noncustodial parent.

In cases where the obligor is a newly hired employee, the agency shall serve, pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5, Rules of Civil Procedure, the National Medical Support Notice, along with the income withholding notice pursuant to

G.S. 110-136.8

, on the employer within two business days after the date of entry of an obligor in the State Directory of New Hires.

The IV-D agency shall notify the employer within 10 business days when there is no longer a current order for medical support for which the agency is responsible.

In cases where the health insurer or health care plan administrator reports that there is more than one health care option available under the health benefit plan, the IV-D agency, in consultation with the custodian, may within 20 business days of the date the insurer or administrator informed the agency of the option, select an option and inform the health insurer or health care plan administrator of the option selected.

History.

2001-237, s. 9.

§ 110-136.13.
Employer responsibilities.

For purposes of this section,

G.S. 110-136.11

, 110-136.12, and 110-136.14, the term “employer” means employer as is defined at 29 U.S.C. § 203(d) in the Fair Labor Standards Act.

Within 20 business days after the date of the National Medical Support Notice, the employer shall transfer the Notice to the health insurer or health care plan administrator that provides health benefit plan coverage for which the child is eligible unless one of following applies:

The employer does not maintain or contribute to plans providing dependent or family health insurance.

The employee is among a class of employees that are not eligible for family health benefit plan coverage under any group health plan maintained by the employer or to which the employer contributes.

Health benefit plan coverage is not available because the employee is no longer employed by this employer.

State or federal withholding limitations prevent the withholding from the obligor’s income of the amount required to obtain insurance under the terms of the plan.

If the employer is not required to transfer the Notice under subsection (b) of this section, then the employer shall, within the 20 business days after the date of the Notice, inform the agency in writing of the reason or reasons the Notice was not transferred.

Upon receipt from the health insurer or health care plan administrator of the cost of dependent coverage, the employer shall withhold this amount from the obligor’s wages and transfer this amount directly to the insurer or plan administrator.

In the event the health insurer or health care plan administrator informs the employer that the Notice is not a “qualified medical child support order” (QMCSO), the employer shall notify the agency in writing.

In the event the health insurer or health care plan administrator informs the employer of a waiting period for enrollment, the employer shall inform the insurer or administrator when the employee is eligible to be enrolled in the plan.

An employer obligated to provide health benefit plan coverage pursuant to this section shall inform the IV-D agency upon termination of the noncustodial parent’s employment within 10 business days. The notice shall be in writing to the agency and shall include the obligor’s last known address and the name and address of the new employer, if known.

In the event the employee contests the withholding order, the employer shall initiate and continue the withholding until the employer receives notice that the contested case is resolved.

An employer shall not discharge from employment, refuse to employ, or otherwise take disciplinary action against any obligor solely because of the withholding.

If a court finds that an employer has failed to comply with this section, the employer is liable as a payor pursuant to G.S. 110-136.8(e). Additionally, an employer who violates this section is liable in a civil action for reasonable damages.

History.

2001-237, s. 10; 2004-203, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 9, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “110-136.14” for “110.14” in subsection (a).

§ 110-136.14.
Health insurer or health care plan administrator responsibilities.

Upon receipt of the National Medical Support Notice from the employer, and within 40 business days after the date of the Notice, a health care plan administrator shall determine if the Notice is a “qualified medical child support order” (QMCSO), as defined under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) or the Child Support Performance and Incentive Act (CSPIA). If the Notice is not a qualified medical support order, the plan administrator shall inform the employer within the time set forth in this subsection.

Upon receipt of the Notice in a nonqualified ERISA plan, or upon a finding that the Notice constitutes a qualified medical child support order, the health insurer or plan administrator shall enroll the dependent child or children in a health benefit plan, determine the cost of the coverage, and inform the employer of the amount of the employee contribution to be withheld from the obligor’s wages, if appropriate. If the child or children are already enrolled in a health benefit plan, the employer shall be so notified. The employer shall also be notified of any applicable enrollment waiting periods.

If there is more than one health benefit plan in which the dependent child or children may be enrolled, the insurer or plan administrator shall so inform the custodian within the time specified in this subsection. If no plan has been selected within 20 days from the date the insurer or administrator informed the agency of the option, the insurer or administrator may enroll the child or children in the insurer’s or administrator’s default option.

If the obligor is subject to a waiting period for enrollment, the insurer or administrator shall inform the agency, the employer, the obligor, and the custodial parent. Upon the completion of the waiting period, the enrollment shall be instituted.

When a court finds that a health insurer or health care plan administrator has failed to comply with this section, the employer is liable as a payor pursuant to G.S. 110-136.10(e). Additionally, a health insurer or health care plan administrator who violates this section is liable in a civil action for reasonable damages.

History.

2001-237, s. 11.

§ 110-137.
Acceptance of public assistance constitutes assignment of support rights to the State or county.

By accepting public assistance for or on behalf of a dependent child or children, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the State or to the county from which such assistance was received of the right to any child support owed for the child or children up to the amount of public assistance paid. The State or county shall be subrogated to the right of the child or children or the person having custody to initiate a support action under this Article and to recover any payments ordered by the court of this or any other state.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 13.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).

§ 110-138.
Duty of county to obtain support.

Whenever a county department of social services receives an application for public assistance on behalf of a dependent child, and it shall appear to the satisfaction of the county department that the child has been abandoned by one or both responsible parents, or that the responsible parent(s) has failed to provide support for the child, the county department shall without delay notify the designated representative who shall take appropriate action under this Article to provide that the parent(s) responsible supports the child.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 14.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).

For article, “Using Hindsight to Change Child Support Obligations: A Survey of Retroactive Modification and Reimbursement of Child Support in North Carolina,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 111 (1987).

§ 110-138.1.
Duty of judicial officials to assist in obtaining support.

Any party to whom child support has been ordered to be paid, and who has failed to receive the ordered support payments for two consecutive months, may make application to a magistrate for issuance of criminal process against the responsible parent for violation of

G.S. 14-322

. If the magistrate determines that the applicant has failed to receive the ordered support for two consecutive months, and that the responsible parent has willfully neglected or refused to make such payments, he shall make a finding of probable cause and issue criminal process for violation of

G.S. 14-322

. It shall be the duty of the District Attorney to prosecute such charges according to law. It shall be the duty of the Clerk of Superior Court to assist the applicant in making such application to the magistrate for the issuance of criminal process, and to supply such necessary child support records as are in his possession to the magistrate, District Attorney, and the Court.

History.

1981, c. 613, s. 4.

§ 110-139.
Location of absent parents.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall attempt to locate absent parents for the purpose of establishing paternity of and/or securing support for dependent children. The Department is to serve as a registry for the receipt of information which directly relates to the identity or location of absent parents, to assist any governmental agency or department in locating an absent parent, to answer interstate inquiries concerning deserting parents, and to develop guidelines for coordinating activities with any governmental department, board, commission, bureau or agency in providing information necessary for the location of absent parents.

In order to carry out the responsibilities imposed under this Article, the Department may request from any governmental department, board, commission, bureau or agency information and assistance. All State, county and city agencies, officers and employees shall cooperate with the Department in the location of parents who have abandoned and deserted children with all pertinent information relative to the location, income and property of such parents, notwithstanding any provision of law making such information confidential. Except as otherwise stated in this subsection, all nonjudicial records maintained by the Department pertaining to child-support enforcement shall be confidential, and only duly authorized representatives of social service agencies, public officials with child-support enforcement and related duties, and members of legislative committees shall have access to these records. The payment history of an obligor pursuant to a support order may be examined by or released to the court, the obligor, or the person on whose behalf enforcement actions are being taken or that person’s designee. Income and expense information of either parent may be released to the other parent for the purpose of establishing or modifying a support order.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law making such information confidential, an employer doing business in this State or incorporated under the laws of this State shall provide the Department with the following information upon certification by the Department that the information is needed to locate a parent for the purpose of collecting child support or to enforce an order for child support: full name, social security account number, date of birth, home address, wages, existing or available medical, hospital, and dental insurance coverage, and number of dependents listed for tax purposes.

(c1)

Employment verifications. —

For the purpose of establishing, enforcing, or modifying a child support order, the amount of the obligor’s gross income may be established by a written statement signed by the obligor’s employer or the employer’s designee or an Employee Verification form produced by the Automated Collections Tracking System that has been completed and signed by the obligor’s employer or the employer’s designee. A written statement signed by the employer of the obligor or the employer’s designee that sets forth an obligor’s gross income, as well as an Employee Verification form signed by the obligor’s employer or the employer’s designee, shall be admissible evidence in any action establishing, enforcing, or modifying a child support order.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law making this information confidential, including Chapter 53B of the General Statutes, any utility company, cable television company, electronic communications or Internet service provider, or financial institution, including federal, State, commercial, or savings banks, savings and loan associations and cooperative banks, federal or State chartered credit unions, benefit associations, insurance companies, safe deposit companies, money market mutual funds, and investment companies doing business in this State or incorporated under the laws of this State, shall provide the Department of Health and Human Services with the following information upon certification by the Department that the information is needed to locate a parent for the purpose of collecting child support or to establish or enforce an order for child support: full name, social security number, address, telephone number, account numbers, and other identifying data for any person who maintains an account at the utility company, cable television company, electronic communications or Internet service provider, or financial institution. A utility company, cable television company, electronic communications or Internet service provider, or financial institution that discloses information pursuant to this subsection in good faith reliance upon certification by the Department is not liable for damages resulting from the disclosure.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-240, s. 13, effective November 6, 2019.

There is established the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit. The duties of the Unit shall be the collection and disbursement of payments under support orders for all cases. The Department may administer and operate the Unit or may contract with another State or private entity for the administration and operation of the Unit.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 15; 1987, c. 591; 1991, c. 419, s. 1; 1995, c. 538, s. 4; 1997-433, ss. 8.1, 9.1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1; 1999-293, s. 22; 2000-140, s. 20(b); 2001-237, ss. 5, 6; 2003-288, s. 3.1; 2019-240, s. 13.

§ 110-139.1.
Access to federal parent locator service; parental kidnapping and child custody cases.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the parent locator service of the Department of Health and Human Services shall transmit, upon payment of the fee prescribed by federal law, requests for information as to the whereabouts of any parent or child to the federal parental locator service when such requests are made by judges, clerks of superior court, district attorneys, or United States attorneys, and when the information is to be used to locate the parent or child for the purpose of enforcing State or federal law with respect to:

The unlawful taking or restraint of a child;

Making or enforcing a child custody determination, including visitation orders;

Establishing paternity; or

Establishing, setting or modifying the amount of, or enforcing child support obligations.

The Department shall not disclose any information from or through the parent locator service if there is reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse and the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the custodial parent.

For the purpose of this section, custody determination means a judgment, decree, or other order of the court providing for the custody or visitation of a child and includes permanent or temporary orders, and initial orders and modifications.

All nonjudicial records maintained by the Department pertaining to the unlawful taking or restraint of a child or child custody determinations shall be confidential, and only individuals directly connected with the administration of the child support enforcement program and those authorized herein shall have access to these records.

History.

1983, c. 15, s. 1; 1997-433, s. 8.2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1.

§ 110-139.2.
Data match system; agreements with financial institutions.

The Department of Health and Human Services and financial institutions doing business in this State shall enter into mutual agreements for the purpose of facilitating the enforcement of child support obligations. The agreements shall provide for the development and operation of a data match system that will enable the financial institutions to provide to the Department on a quarterly basis the information required under G.S. 110-139(d). Financial institutions shall provide the information upon certification by the Department that the person about whom the information is requested is subject to a child support order and the information is necessary to enforce the order. The Department may pay a reasonable fee to the financial institution for conducting the data match required under this section provided that the fee shall not exceed the actual costs incurred by the financial institution to conduct the match.

A financial institution shall not be liable under any State law, including but not limited to Chapter 53B of the General Statutes, for disclosure of information to the State child support agency under this section, and for any other action taken by the financial institution in good faith to comply with this section or with

G.S. 110-139

.

(b1)

The Department of Health and Human Services Child Support Enforcement Agency may notify any financial institution doing business in this State that an obligor who maintains an identified account with the financial institution has a child support obligation that may be eligible for levy on the account in an amount that satisfies some or all of the amount of unpaid support owed. In order to be able to attach a lien on and levy an obligor’s account, the amount of unpaid support owed shall be an amount not less than the amount of support owed for six months or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is less.Upon certification of the amount of unpaid support owed in accordance with G.S. 44-86(c), the Child Support Agency shall serve or cause to be served upon the obligor, and when the matched account is owned jointly, any other nonliable owner of the account, and the financial institution a notice as provided by this subsection. The notice shall include the name of the obligor, the financial institution where the account is located, the account number of the account to be levied to satisfy the lien, the certified amount of unpaid support, information for the obligor or account owner on how to remove the lien or contest the lien in order to avoid the levy, and a reference to the applicable law,

G.S. 110-139

.2. The notice shall be served on the obligor, and any nonliable account owner, in any manner provided in Rule 4 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure. The financial institution shall be served notice in accordance with Rule 5 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure. Upon service of the notice, the financial institution shall proceed in the following manner:

Immediately attach a lien to the identified account.

Notify the Child Support Agency of the balance of the account and date of the lien or that the account does not meet the requirement for levy under this subsection.In order for an obligor or account owner to contest the lien, within 10 days after the obligor or account owner is served with the notice, the obligor or account owner shall send written notice of the basis of the contest to the Child Support Agency and shall request a hearing before the district court in the county where the support order was entered. The obligor account holder may contest the lien only on the basis that the amount owed is an amount less than the amount of support owed for six months, or is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is less, or the contesting party is not the person subject to the court order of support. The district court may assess court costs against the nonprevailing party. If no response is received from the obligor or account owner within 10 days of the service of the notice, the Child Support Agency shall notify the financial institution to submit payment, up to the total amount of the child support arrears, if available. This amount is to be applied to the debt of the obligor.A financial institution shall not be liable to any person for complying in good faith with this subsection. The remedy set forth in this section shall be in addition to all other remedies available to the State for the reduction of the obligor’s child support arrears. This remedy shall not prevent the State from taking any and all other concurrent measures available by law.This levy procedure is to be available for direct use by all states’ child support programs to financial institutions in this State without involvement of the Department.

As used in this subdivision, a financial institution includes federal, State, commercial, or savings banks, savings and loan associations and cooperative banks, federal or State chartered credit unions, benefit associations, insurance companies, safe deposit companies, money market mutual funds, and investment companies doing business in this State or incorporated under the laws of this State.

History.

1997-433, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.122; 1998-17, s. 1; 2003-288, s. 4; 2004-203, s. 42; 2005-389, s. 5; 2015-62, s. 2(c); 2015-117, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 42, effective August 17, 2004, in the first paragraph following subsection (b1), substituted a comma for “and” following “Procedure,” inserted “except that a notice may be served on a financial institution in any other manner that the financial institution has agreed to in writing at any time prior to the time the notice is sent” at the end of the second sentence, and added “The notice” at the beginning of the third sentence.

Session Laws 2005-389, s. 5, effective December 12, 2005, in subsection (b1), in the first paragraph, deleted “delinquent” preceding “child support obligation” and substituted “amount of unpaid support owed” for “delinquency” and
“the amount of unpaid support owed shall be an amount” for “the obligor’s child support obligations shall be in arrears in an amount,” rewrote the second paragraph, in the third paragraph, inserted “or account owner” following “the obligor” four times, deleted “obligor’s” following “of the basis of the,” substituted “obligor account holder . . . the contesting party” for “lien may be contested only on the basis that the arrearage is an amount less than the amount of support owed for six months, or is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or the obligor” and deleted “delinquent” preceding “obligor” at the end of the last sentence, added the second and third sentences to the fourth paragraph; and added “without involvement of the Department” to the end of the fifth paragraph.

Session Laws 2015-62, s. 2(c), effective June 5, 2015, substituted “reference to” for “copy of” preceding “the applicable law” near the end of the second sentence in the second paragraph of subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 5, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “reference to” for “copy of” preceding “the applicable law” near the end of the second sentence in the second paragraph of subsection (b1).

§ 110-139.3.
High-volume, automated administrative enforcement in interstate cases (AEI).

Upon request of another state, the Department of Health and Human Services shall use automated data processing to search State databases and determine if information is available regarding a parent who owes a child support obligation and shall seize identified assets using the same techniques as used in intrastate cases. Any request by another state to enforce support orders shall certify the amount of each obligor’s debt and that appropriate due process requirements have been met by the requesting state with respect to each obligor. The Department of Health and Human Services shall likewise transmit to other states requests for assistance in enforcing support orders through high-volume, automated administrative enforcement where appropriate.

History.

1999-293, s. 7.

§ 110-140.
Conformity with federal requirements; restriction on options without federal funding.

Nothing in this Article is intended to conflict with any provision of federal law or to result in the loss of federal funds.

Effective July 24, 1997, the Department of Health and Human Services shall not elect any child support distribution option for families receiving cash assistance under the State Plan for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Block Grant Program for which the federal government does not provide funding to the State to exercise the option.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1997-223, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.122.

§ 110-141.
Effectuation of intent of Article.

The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services shall supervise the administration of the program in accordance with federal law and shall cause the provisions of this Article to be effectuated and to secure child support from absent, deserting, abandoning and nonsupporting parents.

Effective July 1, 2010, each child support enforcement program being administered by the Department of Health and Human Services on behalf of counties shall be administered, or the administration provided for, by the board of county commissioners of those counties. Until July 1, 2010, it shall be the responsibility of the Department of Health and Human Services to administer or provide for the administration of the program in those counties.

A county may negotiate alternative arrangements to the procedure outlined in

G.S. 110-130

for designating a local person or agency to administer the provisions of this Article in that county.

History.

1975, c. 827, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1186, s. 16; 1979, c. 488; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 76; 1985, c. 244; c. 479, s. 103; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 129; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2009-451, s. 10.46A(a).

§ 110-142.
Definitions; suspension and revocation of occupational, professional, or business licenses of obligors who are delinquent in court-ordered child support, or who are not in compliance with subpoenas issued pursuant to child support or paternity establishment proceedings.

The definitions in

G.S. 110-129

and G.S. 147-54.12 apply to this section and

G.S. 110-142.1

, and

G.S. 110-142.2

. In addition, to these sections the following definitions apply:

“Applicant” means any person applying for issuance or renewal of a license.

“Board” means any department, division, agency, officer, board, or other unit of State government that issues licenses.

“Certified list” means a list provided by the designated representative to the Department of Health and Human Services that verifies, under penalty of perjury, that the names contained therein are obligors who have been found to be out of compliance with a judgment or order for support in a IV-D case.

“Compliance with an order for support” means that, as set forth in a judgment or order for child support or family support, the obligor is no more than 90 calendar days in arrears in making payments for current support, in making periodic payments on a support arrearage, or in making periodic payments on a reimbursement for public assistance, has obtained a judicial finding that precludes enforcement of the order, or has entered into a payment schedule, including

G.S. 110-142.1(h)

, for the child support arrearage with the approval of the obligee in a IV-D case.

“License” means (i) for the purposes of

G.S. 110-142.1

, a license, certificate, permit, registration, or any other authorization issued by a board that allows a person to engage in a business, occupation, or profession or (ii) for the purposes of

G.S. 110-142.2

, a license to operate a regular or commercial motor vehicle, or to participate in hunting, fishing, or trapping.

“Licensee” means any person holding a license.

“Obligor” means the individual who owes a duty to make child support payments under a court order.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 1.4; 1997-433, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1.